Maryland, session 2025, HB0606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
10–804.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE” MEANS A DATABASE
USED BY REAL ESTATE PROFESSIONALS TO FACILITATE THE SALE OF REAL
PROPERTY, INCLUDING USE IN THE PREPARATION OF MARKET EVALUATIONS AND
APPRAISALS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0606*

HOUSE BILL 606
(B) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SALE OF A NEW HOME IN THE STATE, A
DEVELOPER, BUILDER, BROKER, OR REAL ESTATE AGENT SHALL ENTER THE FINAL
SALE PRICE OF THE NEW HOME INTO A MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE OR SIMILARLY
ACCESSIBLE DATABASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.